Hawaii, session 2026, GM1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that state small boat
harbors and state parks serve as vital hubs of recreation and
tourism for residents and visitors. However, facilities at
these locations suffer from significant wear due to constant use
and lack of timely repair, maintenance, and renovation.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Provide the division of boating and ocean recreation
and the division of state parks the flexibility to
undertake certain necessary repairs and renovations
for existing facilities without prior legislative or
gubernatorial authorization;
(2) Establish a notification protocol to ensure that the
legislature is informed of expenditures before they
occur; and
(3) Establish semiannual reporting requirements to the
legislature to ensure transparency and accountability.
2026-2452 SB411 CDl SMA-2.docx
IIIIIMIIHIiniHIIIMIIII

Page 2 S.B. NO.
• h.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 103-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§103-7 Capital improvements; authorizations for;
emergency repairs or reconstruction, [exeeptien-:-] exceptions;
small state boat harbors and state parks; report. (a) All
capital improvement projects requiring the use of general funds,
special funds, general obligation bonds, and revenue bonds of
the State, except projects covered by subsection (b) and
chapter 41D_j_ shall require authorization by the legislature and
the governor.
(b) Capital improvement projects for state small boat
harbors and state parks for the repair, renovation, or
replacement of existing facilities, including dredging, shall
not require authorization from the legislature or governor;
IS provided that an expenditure made under this subsection shall:
(1) Be strictly limited to major repairs, renovations, or
‘ replacements; and
(2) Not be used for yie const£Uct2^on of jiew fa£ilJ^t£es or
appurtenances.
2026-2452 SB411 CDl SMA-2.docx
HiUllltMIHIIIiOIIMIIMIIII

Page 3
S.B. NO.
302
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
A department managing an expenditure made under this subsection
shall issue a written notice to the legislature no later than
fourteen business days before authorizing the expenditure.
(c) The department of land and natural resources shall
submit a semiannual report to the legislature that includes an
account of the total semiannual expenditures incurred for any
expenditure made under subsection (b); types of repairs,
renovations, or replacements completed; justification for each
expenditure; status of ongoing or planned projects; and detailed
accounting of all capital improvement projects. The reports
shall be due no later than June 30 and December 31 of each
year. "
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026;
provided that five years after the effective date of this Act,
this Act shall be repealed and section 103-7, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the
day prior to the effective date of this Act.
2026-2452 SB411 CDl SMA-2.docx
iBHHilinMiiiiiffliniiiin

411
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June ■ 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 411, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
I
Clerk of the Senate
204-26

SB No. 411,SD 2, HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives